Utah statutes.
63M-7-303.   Duties of council.

(1)  The Utah Substance Abuse Advisory Council shall:

(a)  provide leadership and generate unity for Utah's ongoing efforts to combat substance abuse;

(b)  recommend and coordinate the creation, dissemination, and implementation of a statewide substance abuse policy;

(c)  facilitate planning for a balanced continuum of substance abuse prevention, treatment, and justice services;

(d)  promote collaboration and mutually beneficial public and private partnerships;

(e)  coordinate recommendations made by any committee created under Section 63M-7-302;

(f)  analyze and provide an objective assessment of all proposed legislation concerning alcohol and other drug issues;

(g)  coordinate the implementation of Section 77-18-1.1 and related provisions in Subsections 77-18-1(5)(d) and (e), as provided in Section 63M-7-305; and

(h)  comply with Section 32B-2-306.

(2)  The council shall meet quarterly or more frequently as determined necessary by the chair.

(3)  The council shall report its recommendations annually to the commission, governor, the Legislature, and the Judicial Council.

